Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4466.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 624.714, subdivision 18, is amended to read: Subd. 18. Employers; public colleges and universities. (a) An employer, whether public or private, may establish policies that restrict the carry or possession of firearms by its employees while acting in the course and scope of employment. Employment related civil sanctions may be invoked for a violation. (b) A public postsecondary institution regulated under chapter 136F or 137 may establish policies that restrict the carry or possession of firearms by its students while on the institution's property. Academic sanctions may be invoked for a violation. new text begin (c) A public postsecondary institution regulated under chapter 136F or 137 may establish policies that restrict the carry or possession of firearms by visitors while on the institution's property. A person carrying a firearm in violation of the public postsecondary institution policies may be ordered to leave the premises. A person who fails to leave when so requested is guilty of a petty misdemeanor. The fine for a first offense must not exceed $25. Notwithstanding section 609.531, a firearm carried in violation of this subdivision is not subject to forfeiture. new text end deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (d)new text end Notwithstanding paragraphs (a) deleted text begin anddeleted text end new text begin ,new text end (b),new text begin and (c),new text end an employer or a postsecondary institution may not prohibit the lawful carry or possession of firearms in a parking facility or parking area.